Hawaii statutes.
§660-26 Notice to attorney general, when.
If the person is imprisoned on any criminal accusation, reasonable notice shall
be given to the attorney general, or the attorney general's deputy, lawfully
appointed, to appear and object if the attorney general or the attorney
general's deputy thinks fit. [L 1870, c 32, §19; RL 1925, §2749; RL 1935,
§4334; RL 1945, §10375; RL 1955, §239-26; HRS §660-26; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next